Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.535

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Greater benefits not precluded.

Nothing in RCW 41.04.500 through 41.04.530 shall preclude employers of law enforcement officers and firefighters and such employees from entering into agreements which provide benefits to employees which are greater than those prescribed by RCW 41.04.500 through 41.04.530, nor is there any intent by the legislature to alter or in any way affect any such agreements which may now exist.

[ 1985 c 462 s 11.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.